Hawaii statutes.
§489D-12 Renewal of license and annual
report. (a) On or before December 31 of each year, each licensee shall
pay renewal fees based on the number of annualized money transmissions as
follows:

(1) $3,000 for licensees with fewer than 5,000 money
transmissions;

(2) $5,000 for licensees with 5,000 or more but fewer
than 50,000 money transmissions;

(3) $8,000 for licensees with 50,000 or more but
fewer than 100,000 money transmissions;

(4) $16,000 for licensees with 100,000 or more but
fewer than 200,000 money transmissions; and

(5) $20,000 for licensees with 200,000 or more money
transmissions.

For purposes of this subsection,
"annualized money transmissions" means the number of money
transmissions reported for the quarter on the report required by subsection
(b)(2), multiplied by four.

(b) The annual license fee shall be
accompanied by a report, in a form prescribed by the commissioner, which shall
include:

(1) A copy of the licensee's most recent audited
annual financial statement, including balance sheets, statement of income or
loss, statement of changes in shareholder's equity, and statement of cash flows
or, if a licensee is a wholly owned subsidiary of another corporation, the
consolidated audited annual financial statement of the parent corporation in
lieu of the licensee's audited annual financial statement;

(2) For the most recent quarter for which data is
available prior to the date of filing the annual report, but in no event more
than one hundred twenty days prior to the renewal date, the licensee shall
provide the number of money transmissions sold, issued, or received for
transmission by the licensee in the State, the dollar amount of those
transmissions, and the dollar amounts of payment instruments currently
outstanding;

(3) Any material changes to any of the information
submitted by the licensee on its original application that have not previously
been reported to the commissioner on any other report required to be filed
under this chapter;

(4) For the most recent quarter for which data is
available prior to the date of filing the annual report, but in no event more
than one hundred twenty days prior to the renewal date, a list of the
licensee's permissible investments, including the total market value of each
type of permissible investment, and the total dollar amount of all outstanding
payment instruments issued or sold by the licensee in the United States;

(5) A list of the locations, if any, within this
State where business regulated by this chapter is being conducted by either the
licensee or the licensee's authorized delegates;

(6) Disclosure of any pending or final suspension,
revocation, or other enforcement action by any state or governmental authority;

(7) The licensee's evidence of a valid bond or other
security device as required pursuant to section 489D‑7; and

(8) Any other information the commissioner may
require.

A license may be renewed by filing a renewal
statement on a form prescribed by NMLS or by the commissioner and paying a
renewal fee at least four weeks prior to the renewal date for licensure for the
following year.

(c) A licensee that has not filed an annual
report that has been deemed complete by the commissioner or paid its annual
license fee by the renewal filing deadline, and has not been granted an extension
of time to do so by the commissioner, shall have its license suspended on the
renewal date. The licensee shall have thirty days after its license is
suspended to file an annual report and pay the annual license fee, plus a late
filing fee of $250 for each business day after suspension that the commissioner
does not receive the annual report and the annual license fee. The
commissioner, for good cause, may grant an extension of the renewal date or
reduce or suspend the $250 per day late filing fee. [L 2006, c 153, pt of §1;
am L 2008, c 195, §8; am L 2013, c 167, §7]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next